Nevada, session 83, SB141.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 211 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The sheriff, chief of police or town marshal responsible for
the operation of a county, city or town jail or detention facility
shall develop and implement a policy concerning the supervision,
custody, care, security, housing and medical and mental health
treatment of prisoners who are transgender, gender non-
conforming, gender non-binary and intersex. The policy must:
(a) Use respectful language and currently accepted
terminology that accounts for and protects the rights of prisoners
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
who are transgender, gender non-conforming, gender non-binary
and intersex;
(b) Prohibit the discrimination of prisoners who are
transgender, gender non-conforming, gender non-binary and
intersex;
(c) Include, or incorporate by reference, a provision which
designates the factors to be considered when assigning housing,
which must, without limitation, take into account the preference of
prisoners;
(d) Include, or incorporate by reference, a protocol for
searches, which:
(1) Includes considering the preference of a prisoner when
determining the gender of the officer assigned to conduct a
search; and
(2) Prohibits an unclothed search for the purpose of
observing the genitalia of a prisoner after initial intake into the
jail or detention facility, unless reasonable grounds exist;
(e) Require medical personnel to follow the applicable
standard of care when treating a prisoner who is transgender,
gender non-conforming, gender non-binary or intersex;
(f) Require, to the extent practicable, that a prisoner who is
transgender, gender non-conforming, gender non-binary or
intersex have access to preferred clothing, undergarments and
hygiene items, regardless of housing assignment;
(g) Include, or incorporate by reference, provisions that apply
to adult prisoners and juvenile prisoners; and
(h) Include, or incorporate by reference, a timely and fair
grievance or appeal process for any violation of the policy.
2. The sheriff, chief of police or town marshal responsible for
the operation of a county, city or town jail or detention facility
may develop and implement training for members of the staff of
the jail or detention facility in cultural competency for interacting
with prisoners who are transgender, gender non-conforming,
gender non-binary and intersex.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a
county, city or town jail or detention facility to construct
additional buildings or facilities or to implement any additional
training for staff to comply with a policy developed pursuant to
this section.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Gender non-binary” means a person whose gender
identity does not conform to the traditional gender binary of male
and female.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) “Gender non-conforming” means a person whose gender
characteristics or behaviors do not conform to those
characteristics or behaviors traditionally associated with the
biological sex of the person.
(c) “Intersex” means a condition in which a person is born
with external genitals, internal reproductive organs, chromosome
patterns or an endocrine system that does not conform to the
traditional gender binary of male or female.
(d) “Transgender” means a person whose gender identity or
expression differs from the sex assigned to the person at birth.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)